Utah statutes.
63G-6a-1506.   Restrictions on procurement of architect-engineer services.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), when the division or a procurement unit with independent procurement authority, in accordance with Section 63G-6a-1502, elects to obtain architect or engineering services by using a competitive procurement process and has provided public notice of its competitive procurement process:

(a)  a higher education entity, or any part of one, may not submit a proposal in response to the procurement unit's competitive procurement process; and

(b)  the procurement unit may not award a contract to perform the architect or engineering services solicited in the competitive procurement process to a higher education entity or any part of one.

(2)  Subsection (1) does not apply when the procurement unit is procuring architect or engineer services for contracts related to research activities and technology transfer.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

